ko: 접착 강도: 50% 더 강함; 엑스트라 포르테; 엑스트라 스트렝스; 매우 강력함; 순함 (민감 피부용); 오리지널; 레귤러; 기타
ro-RO: Aderența adezivului: Cu 50% mai puternică; Extra forte; Extra-puternic; Foarte puternică; Delicată (piele sensibilă); Original; Normală; Altele
th: ความแข็งแรงของกาว: แรงกว่า 50%; พิเศษแข็งแรง; ความแรงพิเศษ; ติดทนเป็นพิเศษ; อ่อนโยน (สำหรับผิวบอบบาง); ต้นฉบับ; ธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 黏合強度: 增強50%; 超強力; 加強型; 特強; 溫和（敏感肌膚）; 原生; 一般; 其他
pl: Siła klejenia: 50% mocniejszy; Ekstra mocny; Ekstra mocny; Bardzo mocny; Delikatny (skóra wrażliwa); Oryginalny; Zwyczajna; Inne
bg-BG: Сила на лепилото: 50% по-силно; Екстра силно; Екстра сила; Изключително силен; Деликатно (чувствителна кожа); Оригинален; Обикновена; Други
sl-SI: Moč lepila: 50% močnejši; Ekstra forte; Ekstra močna; Ekstra močna; Nežen (občutljiva koža); Izvoren; Običajna; Drugo
ru: Сила приклеивания: На 50% сильнее; Экстра форте; Экстра сильный; Очень прочный; Мягкий (для чувствительной кожи); Оригинал; Обычные; Другой
cs: Síla lepidla: O 50 % silnější; Extra silné; Extra silná; Extra silné; Jemné (citlivá pokožka); Originál; Běžná; Jiné
nl: Kleefkracht: 50% sterker; Extra forte; Extra sterk; Extra sterk; Mild (gevoelige huid); Origineel; Normaal; Andere
tr: Yapışkan gücü: %50 daha güçlü; Ekstra güçlü; Ekstra güçlü; Ekstra güçlü; Nazik (hassas cilt); Orijinal; Normal; Diğer
de: Klebkraft: 50% stärker; Extra stark; Extra stark; Extra stark; Sanft (empfindliche Haut); Original; Normal; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Aderência da tira nasal: 50% mais forte; Extra forte; Força extra; Extra forte; Suave (pele sensível); Original; Normal; Outro
hu: Ragasztóerősség: 50%-kal erősebb; Extra erős; Extra erős; Extra erős; Gyengéd (érzékeny bőrre); Eredeti; Normál; Egyéb
it: Forza adesiva: 50% più forte; Extra forte; Extra forte; Extra forte; Delicato (pelle sensibile); Originale; Regular; Altro
sk-SK: Sila lepidla: O 50% silnejšia; Extra silná; Extra silná; Extra silný; Jemná (citlivá pokožka); Originál; Bežný; Iné
en: Adhesive strength: 50% stronger; Extra forte; Extra strength; Extra strong; Gentle (sensitive skin); Original; Regular; Other
es: Fuerza adhesiva: 50% más fuerte; Extra fuerte; Fuerza extra; Extrafuerte; Suave (piel sensible); Original; Regular; Otros
fr: Force de l’adhésif: 50 % plus fort; Extra fort; Force extra; Très fort; Doux (peau sensible); Original; Normal; Autre
nb: Klebestyrke: 50% sterkere; Ekstra forte; Ekstra styrke; Ekstra sterk; Mild (sensitiv hud); Original; Vanlig; Annet
el: Ισχύς κόλλας: 50% ισχυρότερη; Έξτρα δυνατή; Έξτρα δύναμη; Εξαιρετικά δυνατό; Απαλή (ευαίσθητο δέρμα); Αυθεντικό; Κανονική; Άλλο
hr-HR: Snaga ljepila: 50% jači; Ekstra snažno; Ekstra jaka; Ekstra jako; Nježno (osjetljiva koža); Izvornik; Regularni; Ostalo
ja: 粘着強度: 50%強力; エクストラフォルテ; エクストラストレングス; 非常に強い; やさしい（敏感肌用）; オリジナル; レギュラー; その他
vi: Độ bền kết dính: Mạnh hơn 50%; Siêu mạnh; Siêu mạnh; Cực mạnh; Nhẹ nhàng (da nhạy cảm); Nguyên bản; Thường; Khác
da: Klæbeevne: 50% stærkere; Ekstra forte; Ekstra styrke; Ekstra stærk; Mild (følsom hud); Original; Almindelig; Andet
fi: Liiman voima: 50 % vahvempi; Erittäin vahva; Ekstra vahva; Extravahva; Hellävarainen (herkkä iho); Alkuperäinen; Tavallinen; Muu
zh-CN: 粘合强度: 增强 50%; 特强; 超强型; 超强; 温和（敏感肌肤）; 原创; 常规; 其他
sv: Vidhäftningsstyrka: 50 % starkare; Extra forte; Extra stark; Extra stark; Skonsam (känslig hud); Original; Vanligt; Övrigt
lt-LT: Klijų stiprumas: 50% stipresnis; Ypač stiprus; Ypač stipri; Ypač stiprūs; Švelnus (jautriai odai); Originalus; Įprasti; Kita
pt-BR: Força do adesivo: 50% mais forte; Extra forte; Extra forte; Extra forte; Suave (pele sensível); Original; Regular; Outro